Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.013] MINNESOTA WOMEN'S BILL OF RIGHTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Title; application. new text end new text begin (a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Minnesota Women's Bill of Rights." new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota Women's Bill of Rights applies wherever the state or an instrumentality of the state classifies people on the basis of sex or otherwise defines people as being female or male, women or men, girls or boys, and the definitions contained in this section apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) As used in Minnesota Statutes, administrative rules, and official agency policies: new text end new text begin (1) "woman" means an adult human of the female sex, and a "man" is an adult human of the male sex; new text end new text begin (2) "girl" means a human female who has not yet reached adulthood, and a "boy" is a human male who has not yet reached adulthood; new text end new text begin (3) "mother" means a female parent of a child or children; new text end new text begin (4) "female," when used in reference to a natural person, means an individual who has, had, will have, or would have (but for a developmental anomaly, genetic anomaly, or accident) the reproductive system that at some point produces ova; new text end new text begin (5) "male," when used in reference to a natural person, means an individual who has, had, will have, or would have (but for a developmental anomaly, genetic anomaly, or accident) the reproductive system that at some point produces sperm for fertilization of female ova; new text end new text begin (6) "father" means a male parent of a child or children; and new text end new text begin (7) "sex" means his or her biological sex, either male or female, designated at birth. There are only two sexes, and every individual is either male or female. "Sex" does not include gender identity or any other terms intended to convey a person's sense of self; and gender identity and other terms may not be used as synonyms or substitutes for "sex." new text end new text begin (b) Individuals with differences in sex development also known as DSD or intersex conditions are not a third sex. Individuals with a congenital and medically verifiable DSD diagnosis must be accommodated consistent with state and federal law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Discrimination. new text end new text begin (a) Any policy, program, or statute that prohibits sex discrimination shall be construed to forbid unfair treatment of females or males in relation to similarly situated members of the opposite sex. new text end new text begin (b) Because the state has an important interest in preventing unjust discrimination and in maintaining safety, privacy, and fairness, the state may provide separate single-sex environments for males and females where the sexes are not similarly situated, particularly with respect to biology, including but not limited to athletics, living facilities, locker rooms, bathrooms, domestic violence shelters, and rape crisis centers without running afoul of antidiscrimination mandates. new text end new text begin (c) Wherever the state provides separate single-sex environments for males and females, the definitions established in this section must apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Data collection on the characteristic of sex. new text end new text begin (a) Any public school, public school district, agency, department, or instrumentality of the state that collects vital statistics related to sex for the purpose of complying with state or federal antidiscrimination laws or for the purpose of gathering accurate public health, crime, economic, or other data shall identify each natural person who is part of the collected data set as either male or female as defined in this section. new text end new text begin (b) Compliance with this section shall not require the collection of data regarding sex unless otherwise required by law, and it shall not prevent the collection of additional data points other than biological sex. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin If any provision of this section, or the application of this section to any person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional, the remainder of this section, the amendments made by this section, and the application of the provisions of this section to any person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall delete the word "gender" and insert the word "sex" when the term is standing alone and not part of a phrase, such as gender identity. new text end